Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4387.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 282. (1) For the 2025 tax year only, a qualified taxpayer
may claim a credit against the tax imposed under this part in an
amount equal to all qualified expenses incurred during the tax year
to clean up, repair, restore, or rebuild the qualified taxpayer's
home, property, or business located within the emergency area of
the qualified declaration, or $5,000.00, whichever is less. A
taxpayer shall not claim a credit for any expenses that were
reimbursed to the taxpayer or paid for on behalf of the taxpayer
from any source. To be eligible for the credit under this section,
JHM H02852'25 (H-1) yxc5oh


the qualified taxpayer in a form as prescribed by the department
shall provide reasonable proof in support of qualified expenses for
which a credit is claimed under this section. The form must
include, at a minimum, all of the following:
(a) The taxpayer's federal employer identification number or
the Michigan treasury number assigned.
(b) The taxpayer's address within the emergency area affected
by the severe winter weather and ice storm.
(c) A description of how the taxpayer was affected by the
severe winter weather and ice storm.
(2) For a taxpayer who is a member of a flow-through entity
that qualifies for the credit under this section, that taxpayer may
claim a credit against the member's tax liability under this part
based on the member's distributive share of business income
reported from that flow-through entity or an alternative method
approved by the department.
(3) If the credit allowed by this section exceeds the tax
liability of the taxpayer for the tax year, that portion of the
credit that exceeds the tax liability must be refunded.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) "Qualified declaration" means the state of emergency
declared by the governor on March 31, 2025 and updated on April 2,
2025, under the emergency management act, 1976 PA 390, MCL 30.401
to 30.421, for the severe winter weather and ice storm that began
on March 28, 2025.
(b) "Qualified expenses" means those expenses directly
attributable to the widespread power outages, impassable roads,
loss of telephone and cellular services, and damages to homes,
property, and businesses as a result of the severe winter weather
JHM H02852'25 (H-1) yxc5oh


and ice storm for which a qualified declaration was declared.
Qualified expenses include, but are not limited to, the purchase of
generators, chainsaws, and building materials needed to clean up,
repair, restore, or rebuild the qualified taxpayer's home,
property, or business. Qualified expenses do not include any
expenses that were paid for on behalf of the taxpayer from any
source other than the taxpayer or that were otherwise reimbursed to
the taxpayer from any source.
(c) "Qualified taxpayer" means a taxpayer who is a resident of
a county included within the emergency area of the qualified
declaration.
Final Page
JHM H02852'25 (H-1) yxc5oh